Nebraska, session 109, LB1111.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 70-1025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1025 (1) The representative organization shall file with the
board a coordinated long-range power supply plan containing the following
information:
(a) The identification of all electric generation plants operating
or authorized for construction within the state that have a rated
capacity of at least twenty-five thousand kilowatts;
(b) The identification of all transmission lines located or
authorized for construction within the state that have a rated capacity
of at least two hundred thirty kilovolts; and
(c) The identification of all additional planned electric generation
and transmission requirements needed to serve estimated power supply
demands within the state for a period of twenty years.
(2) The representative organization shall file with the board the
coordinated long-range power supply plan specified in subsection (1) of
this section, and the board shall determine the date on which such report
is to be filed, except that such report shall not be required to be filed
more often than biennially.
(3) An annual load and capability report shall be filed with the
board by the representative organization. The report shall include:
(a) Statewide utility load forecasts and the resources available to
satisfy the loads over a twenty-year period; and
(b) Such other information as the board requests if such request is
submitted in writing to the representative organization, is consistent
with the board's statutory responsibilities, and can be performed at a
reasonable cost.
(4) The annual load and capability report shall be filed on dates
specified by the board.
(5) An annual data center load report shall be filed with the board
by the representative organization. The report shall include:
-2-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
(a) A compilation of the information for proposed and existing data
centers described by subsection (9) of section 70-1506;
(b) A statewide data center load forecast;
(c) A description of existing and proposed electricity generation
needed to meet such load forecast;
(d) A description of transmission additions and enhancements needed
to meet such load forecast;
(e) The estimated costs of all new generation and transmission
needed to meet such load forecast;
(f) Stranded asset costs, including total costs recovered from
ratepayers that are not data centers;
(g) Identification of data center decommissioning resources,
activities, and shortfalls;
(h) The policies, terms, and schedules of all public power suppliers
intended to limit cost and risk impacts of data centers on other retail
customers; and
(i) Such other information the board considers necessary in the
interest of the public.
(6) The annual data center load report shall be filed on dates
specified by the board. The board shall make the information in the
annual data center load report public to the maximum extent permitted by
law.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1506, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1506 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cryptocurrency mining means validating transactions for addition
to a blockchain distributed ledger;
(b) Cryptocurrency mining operation means a data center at least any
facility of one megawatt in size but not exceeding twenty megawatts in
size or greater that conducts cryptocurrency mining; and
(c) Data center means a facility:
-3-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
(i) The primary services of which are the storage, management, and
processing of digital data; and
(ii) That is used to house computer and network systems, including
associated components such as servers, network equipment and appliances,
telecommunications systems, data storage systems, systems for monitoring
and managing infrastructure performance, Internet-related equipment and
services, data communications connections, environmental controls, fire
protection systems, and security systems and services;
(d) Large data center means a data center with a peak electricity
demand of twenty megawatts or more; and
(e) (c) Public power supplier means a public power district,
municipal electric utility, or any other government entity providing
electric service.
(2) When establishing or negotiating rates, tolls, rents, and other
charges for large data centers, a public power supplier shall ensure, to
the maximum extent permitted by law, that:
(a) Each large data center pays the full cost of providing new
electric service to such center, including, but not limited to, the cost
of infrastructure upgrades necessitated by the operation of such center;
(b) The cost of providing electric service to a large data center is
not paid by other retail customers;
(c) Other retail customers are not placed at financial risk for
paying stranded costs associated with providing electric service to large
data centers that have prematurely ceased operation; and
(d) Each large data center bears all decommissioning costs of such
center.
(3) A public power supplier shall impose terms and conditions on a
large data center to require that such center:
(a) Pay the cost of infrastructure upgrades necessitated by the
operation of the large data center;
(b) Prevent transfer of costs and risks of infrastructure upgrades
-4-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
to other retail customers during the operation of the large data center
and, in the event the large data center operation ceases to operate,
before the center pays the full costs of infrastructure upgrades
necessitated for the operation of the center;
(c) Submit a proposal to meet some or all of the large data center
operation's load demand through private electric supplier agreements or
self-generation, as a means to limit the risk of ratepayer stranded-asset
costs;
(d) Comply with any decommissioning requirements adopted by local
governmental entities;
(e) Submit a decommissioning plan to the public power supplier that
obligates the large data center to:
(i) Bear all costs of decommissioning the large data center;
(ii) Post a security bond or other instrument, no later than the
first year following commercial operation of the large data center,
securing the costs of decommissioning the center; and
(iii) Provide a copy of such bond or instrument to the public power
supplier;
(f) Provide the public power supplier with a copy of any required
county or municipal zoning and other permits; and
(g) Enter into a community benefit agreement to mitigate adverse
community impacts.
(4) (2) A public power supplier may impose requirements on any
cryptocurrency mining operation for the cost of infrastructure upgrades
necessitated by such operations, including, but not limited to:
(a) Requiring direct payment or a letter of credit from such
operation for such cost; or
(b) Imposing terms and conditions on such operation that are in the
interest of the public.
(5) (3) Requirements imposed pursuant to this section shall be fair,
reasonable, and not unduly discriminatory.
-5-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
(6) (4) Before any requirement is imposed pursuant to this section,
the public power supplier shall conduct a load study to determine the
costs, impacts, and infrastructure upgrades necessitated by the large
data center or cryptocurrency mining operation.
(7) A public power supplier shall limit electric service to a large
data center to the extent such center is able to acquire electric service
from a private electric supplier or self-generation of the center and
shall interconnect the center's private supplier and self-generation.
(8) (5) Any person intending to install a large data center or
cryptocurrency mining operation is responsible for notifying the local
public power supplier of such intent, and such center or operation is
subject to the interconnection requirements of such supplier.
(9) (6) Each public power supplier shall make available to the
public on the supplier's website the following information for each
proposed and existing data center under the jurisdiction of the supplier:
number of cryptocurrency mining operations under the jurisdiction of the
supplier and the annual energy usage of each operation.
(a) The name of the data center;
(b) The names of the developers and owners of the data center;
(c) The physical size of the data center in square feet;
(d) The location of the data center, including street address and
county;
(e) The electricity demand of the data center;
(f) The suppliers of electricity that would provide electric service
to the data center and the amount of electricity provided by each
supplier, including the names of public power suppliers and any private
electricity suppliers, self-generation, or other energy suppliers;
(g) The customer types and duration of customer demand contracts for
the data center;
(h) The transmission and distribution facility additions and
enhancements required to serve the data center;
-6-

LB1111 LB1111
2026 2026
(i) All energy efficiency, load management, and conservation
measures implemented by the data center;
(j) All commitments by the data center to use renewable energy; and
(k) The service life of the data center.
(10) (7) A large data center or cryptocurrency mining operation
shall allow a public power supplier to interrupt the such operation's
electric service of such center or operation according to such supplier's
established rate schedules and policies.
Sec. 3. Original section 70-1025, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 70-1506, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-7-